test/src/gt-desc-yamls/jolom_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - jolom - ok : # test for possessive forms of noun jolom
    jolom+N+SN: jolom
    jolom+N+PL: jolomeb'
    jolom+N+POSS.1SN+SN: injolom
    jolom+N+POSS.1SN+PL: injolomeb'
    jolom+N+POSS.2SN+SN: aajolom
    jolom+N+POSS.2SN+PL: aajolomeb'
    jolom+N+POSS.3SN+SN: xjolom
    jolom+N+POSS.3SN+PL: xjolomeb'
    jolom+N+POSS.1PL+SN: qajolom
    jolom+N+POSS.1PL+PL: qajolomeb'
    jolom+N+POSS.2PL+SN: eejolom
    jolom+N+POSS.2PL+PL: eejolomeb'
    jolom+N+POSS.3PL+SN: xjolomeb'
    jolom+N+POSS.3PL+PL: xjolomeb'
    
